Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-103] Retention of written
determinations. Written determinations required by this chapter shall be
retained in the appropriate official files of the chief procurement officer or
in the case of delegated authority, in the files of that purchasing agency. [L
Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next